Tennessee, session 114, SB1469.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 50, Chapter 5, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
50-5-301. As used in this part:
(1) "Account holder" means a person who has an account or profile to use an
online platform;
(2) "Content creation" means the act of sharing video content filmed in this state
on an online platform in exchange for compensation;
(3) "Content creator":
(A) Means an individual who is eighteen (18) years of age or older who is
engaged in content creation; and
(B) Includes:
(i) A parent; or
(ii) An entity assuming the name or identity of an individual or
individuals or family, for the purposes of the content creator;
(4) "Family" means:
(A) The members of a household living, on a full-time or a part-time
basis, in one (1) house, condominium, apartment, or other dwelling;
(B) Individuals related by blood or ancestry, marriage, or adoption; or
SB1469
009076
- 1 -

(C) An individual who is held out to the public as being a family member
of a minor;
(5) "Internet" means the combination of computer facilities and electromagnetic
transmission media, and related equipment and software, comprising the interconnected
worldwide network of computer networks that employ the Transmission Control
Protocol/Internet Protocol or any successor protocol to transmit information;
(6) "Minor" means an individual who is under eighteen (18) years of age, is not
emancipated, and is a resident of this state;
(7) "Online platform":
(A) Means an internet website or application that allows a person to
create an account or profile and that enables an account holder to communicate
or share posts, or both, with other account holders and users; and
(B) Does not include:
(i) A broadband internet access service, as defined in 47 CFR §
8.1(b);
(ii) An email service;
(iii) An internet service, internet application, or website:
(a) That consists primarily of content that is not generated
by account holders or users, but rather is preselected by the
service, application, or website provider; and
(b) For which interactive functionality is incidental to,
directly related to, or dependent upon, the preselected content
described in subdivision (7)(B)(iii)(a);
(iv) Online shopping, if the interaction with other account holders
or users is predominantly limited to the ability to send, receive, request, or
- 2 - 009076

settle funds, comment on transactions, display goods for sale, engage as
consumers about products and reviews, or share a wish list;
(v) An internet service, internet application, or website that
primarily provides career development opportunities;
(vi) A cloud storage or cloud computing service;
(vii) An online service, application, or website in which interaction
between users is predominately used for technical support, or limited to
reviewing products offered for sale by electronic commerce or
commenting on such reviews shared by other users; or
(viii) Peer-to-peer payment platforms, if the interaction with other
users or account holders is generally limited to the ability to send, receive,
or request funds and to like or comment on such transactions, or other
functions that are focused on sending, receiving, requesting, or settling
payments between users or account holders;
(8) "Parent" means a parent, guardian, or individual who has custody of, or
caregiving authority over, a minor;
(9) "Person" means an individual or entity;
(10) "Post" means content that an account holder makes available on an online
platform for other account holders and users to consume, and includes information,
ideas, news, stories, opinions, images, and videos; and
(11) "User" means a person who consumes posts on an online platform, but is
not an account holder.
50-5-302.
(a) A minor is engaged in the work of content creation if the following criteria are
met at any time during the previous twelve-month period:
- 3 - 009076

(1) At least thirty percent (30%) of a content creator's compensated video
content produced within a thirty-day period included the likeness, name, or
photograph of the minor. Content percentage is measured by the percentage of
time the likeness, name, or photograph of the minor or if more than one (1) minor
regularly appears in the content creator's content, any of the minors, visually
appears or is the subject of an oral narrative in a video segment as compared to
the total length of the segment; and
(2) The number of views received per video segment on an online
platform met the platform's threshold for generating compensation or the content
creator received actual compensation for video content equal to or greater than
one cent (1¢) per view.
(b)
(1) A minor under fourteen (14) years of age shall not engage in the work
of content creation as described in subsection (a).
(2) A content creator who features a minor working in violation of
subdivision (b)(1), or a parent who permits a minor under the parent's control or
custody to engage in the minor's own content creation in violation of subdivision
(b)(1), is subject to a civil penalty of two thousand dollars ($2,000) per violation.
The content creator shall also compensate the minor in accordance with § 50-5-
304.
(3) Each instance of a minor working in violation of subdivision (b)(1) is
considered a separate violation.
(4) All civil penalties owed under this subsection (b) must be paid to the
commissioner of labor and workforce development, to be used for the
administration of this section.
- 4 - 009076

(c) A minor who is fourteen (14) years of age or older, but under eighteen (18)
years of age, may produce, create, and publish the minor's own video content and must
receive one hundred percent (100%) of the proceeds of the minor's compensation for the
minor's own content creation.
(d) A minor who appears incidentally in a video that depicts a public event that a
reasonable person would know to be broadcast, including a concert, competition, or
sporting event, and is published by a content creator is not engaged in the work of
content creation.
50-5-303.
(a) A content creator whose video content features a minor who is fourteen (14)
years of age or older, but under eighteen (18) years of age, engaged in the work of
content creation as described in § 50-5-302(a) shall maintain the following records and
retain the records until the minor reaches twenty-one (21) years of age:
(1) The name and documentary proof of the age of the minor engaged in
the work of content creation;
(2) The amount of content creation that generated compensation as
described in § 50-5-302(a) during the reporting period;
(3) The total number of minutes of content creation for which the content
creator received compensation during the reporting period;
(4) The total number of minutes a minor was featured in content creation
during the reporting period;
(5) The total compensation generated from content creation featuring a
minor during the reporting period; and
(6) The amount deposited into the trust account for the benefit of the
minor engaged in the work of content creation as required by § 50-5-304.
- 5 - 009076

(b) The content creator shall provide notice to the minor of the existence of the
records required by subsection (a) and the records must be readily accessible to the
minor for review.
50-5-304.
(a) A content creator shall compensate a minor who is engaged in the work of
content creation under § 50-5-302(a) in accordance with this section. The content
creator shall set aside gross earnings on the video content that includes the likeness,
name, or photograph of the minor in a trust account to be preserved for the benefit of the
minor until the minor reaches eighteen (18) years of age, according to the following
distribution:
(1) If only one (1) minor meets the content threshold described in § 50-5-
302(a)(1), the percentage of total gross earnings on a video segment including
the likeness, name, or photograph of the minor that is equal to or greater than
half of the content percentage that includes the minor as described in § 50-5-
302(a)(1); or
(2) If two (2) or more minors meet the content threshold described in §
50-5-302(a)(1), and a video segment includes two (2) or more of those minors,
the percentage described in subdivision (a)(1) for all minors in a segment must
be equally divided between the minors regardless of differences in percentage of
content provided by the individual minors.
(b) A trust account required by subsection (a) must provide that:
(1) The money in the account is available only to the minor engaged in
the work of content creation;
(2) The account is held by a state or national bank, savings and loan
association, credit union, or trust company;
- 6 - 009076

(3) The money in the account becomes available to the minor engaged in
the work of content creation upon the minor attaining eighteen (18) years of age
or upon a declaration that the minor is emancipated; and
(4) The account meets the requirements of the Tennessee Uniform
Transfers to Minors Act, compiled in title 35, chapter 7.
(c) If a content creator violates this section, then the minor may commence a
civil action to enforce this section regarding the trust account. In an action brought in
accordance with this subsection (c), the court may award the following damages:
(1) Actual damages, including any compensation owed under subsection
(a);
(2) Punitive damages; and
(3) The costs of the action, including attorney fees and court costs.
(d) This section does not have an effect on a party that is neither the content
creator nor the minor who engaged in the work of content creation.
50-5-305.
(a) In addition to the civil action provided in § 50-5-304(c), the minor may
commence a civil action against a content creator for injunctive relief or other relief the
court finds just and equitable to enforce this part.
(b) The powers and remedies provided in this part are cumulative and
supplementary to all other powers and remedies otherwise provided by law. The
invocation of one (1) power or remedy in this part does not exclude or prohibit the use of
another available remedy.
50-5-306.
(a) A waiver or limitation, or a purported waiver or limitation, of a protection or
requirement provided under this part is void as unlawful and against public policy.
- 7 - 009076

(b) A court, arbitrator, or tribunal shall not enforce or give effect to a waiver or
limitation described in subsection (a), notwithstanding a contract or choice of law
provision in a contract.
50-5-307.
Video content containing the likeness of a minor must be deleted and removed
from an online platform by the person who shared the content, the account holder, or
another person who has control over the account when the request is made by a minor
who is fourteen (14) years of age or older whose likeness appears in the content, or by
an adult who was under eighteen (18) years of age when the person's likeness was used
in the content.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 8 - 009076